District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1651

Natural Gas Trust Fund; public purpose programs.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-342, § 101, 52 DCR 2346
Oct, 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2191, 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 2072, 53 DCR 6899
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 2082, 54 DCR 7052
Oct 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-250, § 212(b)(1), 55 DCR 9225

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 101 of Omnibus Utility Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-12, January 28, 2005, 52 DCR 2945).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2191 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2072 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2072 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2072 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 212(b) of Clean and Affordable Energy Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-508, September 25, 2008, 55 DCR 10856).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle K of title II of Law 16-33: Section 2191 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle K of title II of the act may be cited as the Natural Gas Fund Amendment Act of 2005.

Short title: Section 2071 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided that subtitle F of title II of the act may be cited as the “Natural Gas Trust Fund Amendment Act of 2006”.

Short title: Section 2081 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle I of title II of the act may be cited as the “Natural Gas Trust Fund Amendment Act of 2007”.